Wyoming, session 2025, SF0098.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-6-131 is created to read:

22-6-131. School board trustee candidates party
affiliation.

A candidate for school board trustee shall have printed on
the general election ballot the political party with which
SF0098

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0471
the candidate is affiliated. The secretary of state shall
promulgate any necessary rules to implement this section.

Section 2. W.S. 22-6-123 is amended to read:

22-6-123. Nonpartisan election ballots and ballot
propositions.

Primary and general election ballots for nonpartisan
offices and ballot propositions shall be printed on yellow
paper or paper with yellow demarcation as provided by rule
and regulation of the secretary of state, separate from
partisan ballots. They shall contain no political party
designations, except as authorized by law, but otherwise
shall conform to the same general requirements for official
partisan ballots except as otherwise specifically provided.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0098